Georgia, session 2025_26, HB547.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Code Section 48-5-7.4 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to preferential
assessment for bona fide conservation use property and bona fide residential transitional
property, is amended by adding a new subsection to read as follows:
"(e.1)(1) A single owner, as described in subparagraph (a)(1)(C) of this Code section,
who has multiple parcels of bona fide conservation use property that are collectively
subject to more than one valid covenant under this Code section may combine such
parcels and covenants in whole under a single, new, ten-year covenant for bona fide
conservation use without constituting a breach of any of the covenants, provided that all
H. B. 547
- 1 -

LC 44 3075
such property would be otherwise eligible to be placed under a renewal covenant under
this Code section by the owner upon the natural expiration of the original covenant.
(2) The provisions of this subsection shall not permit or be construed to:
(A) Allow any portion of property held under a covenant to be removed from the
covenant without being combined into the new covenant;
(B) Change any requirements for what constitutes qualified property; or
(C) Change any requirements for what constitutes qualifying use for purposes of this
Code section.
(3) A single owner, as described in subparagraph (a)(1)(C) of this Code section, desiring
to proceed with combining parcels pursuant to paragraph (1) of this subsection shall first
file a real property tax return with the appropriate board of tax assessors on or before the
deadline to file a real property tax return.
(4) Parcels on which delinquent taxes are owed shall not be eligible to be combined
pursuant to paragraph (1) of this subsection."
SECTION 2.
This Act shall become effective on January 1, 2026.
SECTION 3.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 547
- 2 -